output/hyph-id.level2.pat.txt
.air2
.ai2s
.ajo1
.al2a
.am2a
.ar2a
.as2a
.at2a
.aya2
.bu1t
.cul2
.ece2
.ef1l
.ek1l
.el2a
.elo1
.ena2
.era2
.ere2
.fi2r
.hu1t
.iku2
.in2a
.ir2a
.ja1h2
.ki1h
.kil2
.la1h2
.lap2
.ng2
.no2n
.nut2
.oba2
.ob1l
.ok1l
.olo2
.omo2
.on2a
.op1l
.rot2
.ru1t2
.sut2
.te2r
.ti1h
.tol2
.ua2
.uba2
.ubu2
.uga2
.uja2
.ul2a
.um2a
.umi2
.up2
.usi2
.ut2
.wat2
.wet2
.wu1t
a1a
aa2f1
aala2
aa2li
aa2t1
a1b
ab1l
1abn
1abs
abuh1
abu2r
a1c
aca2k
aca2p
ace2
acet1
2aci
aci2k
acit2
a2cr
acu2m
a1d
2adal
2adas
1adeg
1adeh
ade2p
adi1h
1adil
2adim
1adm
1adop
1ads
1adud
adu1t2
1adv
a1e
2aeh
a2e1k
a2ero
a1f
a2fan
1afd
a2f1l
a1g
ag2a
aga2h1
aga2i
ag2h
ag2i
a2gl
ag2o
agok2
a2gr
1agre
agul2
2agu2m
agut1
a1haw
2ahe
ahe2m
a2hen
a1hir
a1hiy
a1ho
ah1og
2ahu
a2hub
ah1uy
a1iah
a1ib.
a1ibk
a1id
a1if
a1ih
a1ik.
a2iku
a1il.
ail2a
a1ilk
a1ilm
a1ilo
a1imb
a1i2n
a1ir
a1is
a2isa
a2isy
a1it
ai2ta
a1iw
a1iy
a1j
aje2r
aj1l
1ajo
ajum2
1ajus
a2kac
a2k1ag
ak1ef
ak1eg
1akib
a2kic
aki1h
aki2m
aki2t
ak1l
a2kog
a2koy
2akp
aks2
a1l
1alie
1ali2h
1alko
alot2
2alum
alu2n
a2man
2amer
2ampa
2amu
2ana
an1an
2anci
2and
an1ed
1aneh
an1ej
2ang
a1ngo
a1ngu
2anh
2ani
anir2
anju2
2ank
2anl
2anm
1ann
2ano
2anr
2ans
2ant
2anv
2any
a1o
a2oe
ao2k1
a1p
a2pac
1apam
a2p1an
a2pen
apil2
ap1l
1apli
1aplu
apme1
a2pr
1apri
ap2si
a2p1ud
apu1t
1aqs
ar2ak
arce1
aret1
arn2
a2ror
arse1
aru2l
aru2m
aru2s
a1s
as1an
asa2p
asi2s
1aspi
as2po
asu2h1
asuk1
2asus
a2sy
1asyi
a1t
a2ta
at1an
ata2p
ata2s
a2ti.
a2ua
a1uco
1audi
a1uh.
a2uha
aui1
a1uk.
a1ukp
a2uku
a1ul.
a1ulh
a1um.
au2ma
aume1
1aumk
a1un
auni2
a1up.
a1ur
a1us.
a1ut
1auto
a1uw
a1uy
a2uz
a1v
a1w
awa2k
2awal
2awat
awer2
1awet
2awi
awig1
awu2t
a1x
a1y
aya2l1
aya2r
1ayom
ayu2b
a1z
ba1i2b
ba2id
ba1i2k
ba2kh
bali2
b1amp
ba1u
2b1b
2b1d
beca2
bek1l
b2el
bel2a
be2n1o
be2r
b1etn
betu2
2b1f
2b1g
2b2h2
bhu1
bia2k1
bi2b1a
bin2a
bio1k
bi2ta
2b1j
bja2d
2b1k
bku1
bkut2
2bl
bla2g
bla2k1
b2le.
bles1
b1li
b2lo.
b2log
blos1
b1lu
2b1m
2b1n
b2o
bo2ka
bon2a
bop1l
2b1p
2b2r2
bra2k
bruk1
2b1s2
2b1t
bu2bi
bu2ha
bu2he
bu2il
bu2ka
bu1kh
bul2a
bu2ni
2b1v
2b1w
2b1y
bya2
byak1
byo2
2b1z
cabi2
cabu2
cada2
ca1hi
ca1il
ca1im
ca1kw
ca2ma
ca2ni
ca2ti
cat2s
ca1ul
ca1us
cebu2
ce2h
cek1l
celi1
ce2u
2c2h
ciba2
ci2l
cin2a
cip1l
ci2s1
co2k
cok1l
col2a
come2
cop1l
core2
co2ta
c2r
cri2
cub2
cui2
culi2
cum2a
cu2ni
cut1
d2a
da2ba
da2em
da2id
da2i1h
da1il
da2mi
damu2
da2ne
da2pa
da2p1e
da2pi
da1ud
da2ve
2d1b
2d1d
2deal
deti2
d1f
2d1g
d2h2
di2fr
di2li
din2a
di2pi
di2so
2d1j
2d1k
2d1l
2d1m
2d1n2
dob1l
do2e
do2id
dok2a
do2s1o
do2t
do1u
2d1p
2d2r2
dron2
druk1
2d1s
2d1t
du2k
du1kh
du2p
dut1
du2te
du2ti
2d1v
2dw
2dy
d1yu
2dz.
e1a
ea1i2
eaib1
eaka2
eala2
eam2a
eara2
ea1us
e1b
eba2k1
eb1l
ebo2m
2e1c
eci2k1
e2cr
e1d
2ed.
eda2k
edro2
e1e
ee2li
eelo2
eema2
eena2
e1f
e2flo
e2fr
e1g
eg2a
ega1i
ega2k
eg2i
e2g2l
eg2o
ego2g1
2egol
e2gr
eguk1
e1h
e2han
e2hek
eh1ol
ehu1
e1i
ei2bu
e2ie
e2ig
e2ih
e2ij
e2it
e2iy
e1j
1ejaw
ejuk1
ek2ad
ek2ak
ek2al
e2kan
e1kh
ek1lu
1eksp
ek1uc
1ekui
ekul2
e1l
e2laj
el2i
1elue
em2a
ema1u
emel2
1emig
e1m2le
emo1k
em2ro
en2i
1enkr
enpe2
e1o
eok2a
eo1kl
eot2
e1p
epa2s
ep2h
ep1l
e2pr
e2rer
e2r1ir
e2r1iz
erot2
er1uf
er1ur
e1s
1esae
esa2k
esa2n
esa2p
esa2u
2ese
esek1
esi1h2
1esok
es2ri
e1t
etak1
e2tan
ete2m
ete2s1
eto2p
e2tug
etu1h
e1u
e2uc
eudi2
e2uh
eu1k
e2ul
e2un
eup2
eu1t
e2uy
e1v
1evak
2evl
e1w
ewek1
ewo2
e1y
e1z
fa1hi
fa1i2
fait1
faku2
fa1ng
f2ar
fa2u
fa2z
faz1a
2f1b
2f1d
feni2
feti2
2f1f
f1g
2f1h
fhu2
2f1k
f2lo1
f1lon
2f1m
2f1n
fo2a
fok2
f2r
2fri
2fru
2f1s
2f1t
ful2a
f1w
f1y
fya1
g2aa
g1abd
g1abj
g1abl
g2abu
g1ac
g2aca
g2ad.
g2ade
gafa2
g1afk
g2age2
g2ah
ga2h1u
g2ai
ga1il
g2ak.
g2aka
g1akh
g1akr
g1aks
g1akt
g1aku
g2ala
g2ale
g2alo
g2am.
g2ami2
g2ap
ga2pa
gap1e1
g2ar
g1ars
g1arw
g2as.
gasa2
g1aso
g1asu
g2at
g2au.
g1aud
ga1u2l
g1a1um1
ga1u2s
g1aye
g1az
2g1b
g1c
2g1d
gde2g1
g1ef
g1ego
g1eje
ge1kl
g1eks
1geom
g2es.
g1esk
g1ets
ge2ur
g1ev
g1eye
2g1f
2g1g2
gga2p
gga2t
ggek1
ggok1
gguk1
ggu2t
2g1h2
ghu1t
gi2ak
g1iap
gia2s
g1ibi
g1ibr
gibu2
g1ici
g1id
g1iht
g1ij
g1ikh
g1ikl
g1ikr
g1ikt
g1iku
g2il.
gil2a
g1ilh
g1im
gima2
g1ind
g1inj
g1ins
g1int
gi2ny
1gioe
1giog
giok1
1giol
1giop
gira2
g1ire
g1isb
g2isi
g1iso
g2ist
g1isy
g2it
1givi
2g1j
2g1k2
gkah1
gka2k
gka2p
gke2b1
gke2d1
gkek1
gke2m
gki2
gko2k
gko2s
gku2m
gku2s
gku2t
g1l
2glia
g2lim
g2los
2g1m
gmo2g
2g1n2
goak1
g1ob
godo2
g2ogr
2gohm
g2oi
go2k
gok1l
g1oks
g1oku
g2on.
gon2a
g1one
g2opa
g2opi
g2opr
g1ord
gore2
g1ork
g1orn
go1u
2g1p
g1q
g2r2
1gred
grek1
gri2s
2gro
g1s2
gsal2
gset1
gsut1
2g1t
g2u
gua2l
g1uap
guba2
gubi2
2g1uj
gu2ka
g1uki
g1ule
g1ulo
gum2a2
g1umb
g1umr
gumu2
g1usi2
guti2
gutu2
2g1w
2g1y
1ha.
1haa
1hab
h1ac
1had
hae2
1haf
1hag
1hah
1hai
ha1ib
ha2in2
1haj
1hak
h1aks
1hal
hal2a
1ham
hami2
h1an
1hana
h2anc
1hang
1hank
1hant
1h2anu
1hao
1hap
1har
2hart
1has
1hat
1ha1u
ha2ur
1hay
2h1b
hber1
2h1c
h1d
hde1
1he
h1eke
hela1
her2a2
2h1f
2h1g
h1h
2hi.
1hia
hia2s
1hib
hibu2
1hid
1hif
1hih
1hij
1hik
1hil
1him
hi2mi
1hin
1hip
hi2ri
1hit
hit2a2
h1j
hja1
2h1k
2h1l
hle1
2h1m2
2h1n
2hog
ho2pa
2h1ops
1hor
2h1p
hpo1
2h1r
2h1s
2h1t
1hu
huja2
hum2
hut2a
hu2ti
2huy
h1w
hwa1
2h1y
h1z
i1a
ia2gu
iaku2
ia2ma
ia2ni
ia2pa
i1b
1i2bai
i2ban
2ibe
ibil2
ib1l
ib2le
1ibub
i1c
ice1n
ici2
i1d
ida2k
idi2k1
idi2l
2idu
iduk1
idu2l
id1y
i2dz
i1e
iero2
i1f
i2fa
if1an
2ifi
i2f1l
if2le
i1g
ig2a
i2gaw
iger2
ig2i
igir2
i2g2l
igo2n
i2gr
igur2
iha2k1
2ihe
i1hi
i1ho
1ihr
ih1up
i1i
i1j
ijak1
1ijaz
2iji2
ijik1
1ijt
i1k
2ika
i2kh
ikh1i
1ikht
iki2k1
iki2t
ik1l
2iko
iks2
ikum2
iku2t
ik2w
i1l
2ilan
i2laq
2ile
ile2s1
ili2k
1ilmi
ilok2
im2a
imai2
1imaj
imba2
2ime
imme1
2imo
1impl
2impu
2inah
ina2i
inat2
1incr
inda2
2ine
1inf
inga2
2inge
i1ngi
i1ngo
i1ngu
1inh
2init
2iniu
inja2
1inko
1inp
1insp
1inst
1insy
inu2m
1inv
2iny
i1o
ioe2k
iok2a
1ionk
ior2a
i1p
i2pan
ipe2r
ip1ic
i2pr
1ipri
ipti2
ipuk1
i1q
i1r
2ira
ir2ad
ir1an
irau2
irce1
2ire
ire2p1
iri2m
iri2n
irip1
iri2s
2iru
ir2uc
is1an
1isap
2ise
1isei
ise2n
2isir
2isit
2isu
is1ui
1isuk
i1t
i2t1an
1itib
2itu
i1u2
iul1
ium1
iup1
iura2
ius1
i1v
i1w
i1x
i1y
iyat2
i1z
ja1i
jaib1
ja2ik
jai2l
ja2in
ja2k
jal2a
jama2
jana1
ja2ne
jap2a
jara2
ja1uh
ja2ut
jawa2
2j1b
2j1d
je2h
je2k1
jeme2
jer2a
je2u
ji2ba
jida2
ji1h
jila2
jili2
jip1l
jir2
ji2ri
2j1j
2jl
j1lo2
2j1m
2j1n
jo2gl
jo2k
jor2a
jor2k
jo2ta
2j2r
2j1t
jua2l
ju1hi
ju2k
juk1o
ju2ti
ju1t2s
2j1w
1ka
k2aa
k2abu
k1adu2
kago2
ka2he
k1ahl
ka1h2y
ka1ib
ka1im
kak2a
k1akr
k1aku
kal2i
ka2ng
2kany
ka2pa
k2ar
k2at.
ka1ul
ka1um
2k1b
kba1
2k1c
2k1d
1ke
keas2
ke1kl
ke1kr
kel2a
ken2a
k1enj
ker2a
kes2p
kes2t
kes2w
k2et
k1f
2k1g
k2h
kh2a
khat2
1khaw
1khay
1khi
1khod
1ki
2ki.
kia2l
kibu2
k2ih
ki2ok
ki2om
2kism
kit1u
ki2ur
2k1j
kju2
kjub1
2k1k
2kl2
1klad
kla2k1
k1lam
k1lar
k1le
k1lif
kli2k
k2lin
k1log
1k2lor
k2los
kluk1
klu2m
2k1m
kmu2m
2k1n
kne1
1k2o
ko2ka
kon2a
ko2ng
kor2a
2korb
ko1u
2k1p
kpi1
2k2r2
kra2b
kra2k
1kreo
1krid
2k1s
kse2u
ks2ta
ks2to
ksum2
2k1t
kta1h2
kti2m
ktor2
1k2u
k1ube
2kud.
ku1kr
ku2p
k1w
k2we
k2wo
k1y
k1z
kzi2m
1la.
2labs
laci1
lada2
l1a2dh
2ladm
1lah
la2ho
la1ip
lai2r
la2it
laja2
l1ajn
2l1akh
2lalk
lamo1
l1amr
2lan
l1an.
l1anf
1lap
l2as
la1ud
la1uj
la1ul
laya2
l1azm
2l1b
2l1c
2l1d
le2h
le2i
len2a
ler2a
2l1f
l2fr
2l1g2
lga1
2l1h2
lha2m
2lihd
2lihr
2liht
l1ikh
lik2l
lil2a
2l1ilm
l2in
1lip
li2r
lis2a
2l1isl
2l1ism
lis2p
l1isr
liur2
2l1j
2l1k
lk1l
2l1l
lla1
lla2h
2l1m2
lma2l
2l1n
lna1
loak1
1lof
loju1
2lokl
lo2ko
1lom
lon2a
lor2a
1los
2l1p
2l1q
2l1r
lra1
2l1s2
lse1n
lsi2o
2l1t
lua2r
lum2a
luna2
2luo
2l1v
2l1w
lwat2
2l1y
2l1z2
1ma
maca2
m2ad
mad1y
mag2l
ma1hi
ma1ib
ma1im
mait2
mam2a
2m1an.
map2
mapa2
mar2a
ma1ua
ma1um
ma1up
ma2ur
ma1uz
2m1b2
m1c
2m1d
1me
me2h
mepe2
mer2u
me2u
2m1f
m1g2
m1h2
1m2i
mi1h
mil2i
min2a
2minf
mi2ng
2mism
miu1
2m1j
2m1k
2m1l
mla2u
2m1m
2m1n
1m2o
mop2
mo1ur
2m1p2
mpa2s
mpe2
mpi2n
mpi2t1
mpo2k1
2m1r
mri1n
mro2g
1mrop
2m1s2
msa2k1
2m1t
mti1
mtih2
1m2u
muas2
mul2a
mu2ma
mupu2
mu1t
m1v
2m1w
mwu1
m1y
m1z
1na
2naca
na2e
n1aer
nag2
na1ib
na1i2k
na1il
na1im
na2is
n2ak
na2ke
2nan
n1an.
n2ane
nap2a
na1ug
na1up
na2u2r
na2ut
2n1b
nber1
nbun2
n1c
nci2n
ncu2t
n1d
n2d1av
ndu2n
1ne
neba2
negu2
ne2h
neku2
nel2
ner2a
n2et
neta2
n1f
2ng.
1nga.
1ngaa
ng1ad
ng1ae
ng1ag
1nga2h
1ngai
ng1am
ng1an
1ngao
1ngat
1ngau
1ngav
ng1aw
1nge
ngeb2
2ngef
2ngeg
2ngek
2ngem
2ngen
2ngev
2ngey
2ngi.
1ngia
1ngic
1ngif
ng1ig
1ngih
1ngip
1ngit
1ngiu
2ngiv
1ngiw
1ngiy
ng1iz
1ngo.
1ngoa
1ngoc
1ngod
1ngoe
1ngof
ng1og
1ngoh
ng1oj
1ngom
1ngon
1ngoo
2ng1op
1ngos
1ngot
1ngov
1ngoy
ng1oz
2ngt
1ngu.
ng1ub
1ngue
1nguf
ng1ug
1nguh
2ngum
1ngut
1nguy
n1h2
1ni
nia2l
nidu2
ni2r1a
ni1s2f
2nism
n1iso
ni1sw
nit2a
n1j2
nja1h
njuk1
2n1k
nkan2
nkap2
nke2s1
nk2l
n1l
nla1h2
n1m
n1n
1no
nok2a
no1kl
no1kw
no2na
no2n1e
nono2
no2nu
nopi2
nor2a
n1p
n1r2
n1s2
nsa2f1
n2s1ak
nsal2
nso2n
n2s1ov
nsu2r
nsu1t2
n1t2
ntab2
nte2p
1nu
nu2ak
nua2m
nuga2
nuit2
nuka2
num2a
nuna2
nur2a
nu1s2w
nu2sy
nu2ti
nutu2
n1v
n1w
nwat2
1ny
n1z
n2zi.
o1a
oa2a
oa2e
oag2
oa2k
oan2g
oa2se
oa2u
o1b
2oba
obe2
obek1
1obj
ob1le
ob1lo
2obok
obo2r
obos1
1obs
o1c
oce2
ocek1
o2c1l
ocup2
o1d
oda2l
o2d1h
odip2
odo2n
odo2s
o1e
oe2i
oen2a
oe2r
o1f
o1g2
oga2h1
1ogak
ogok1
ogol2
o2gre
o2gri
o1h
o2h2a
ohat2
1ohm
o1i
o2ia
o2ih
o2ik
oik1a
o2ip
o2it2
o2iw
o1j
o2k1an
okek1
oke2n
o1kh
1ok1lu
o1kr
1okup
ok2w
o1l
ola2k1
ol2i
olit2
olut2
o1m
om2a
omo2r
one2n
o1ngo
on2i
1onsl
on1un
2o1o
o2od
o1p
2op.
2opek
op1li
o2pr
2opy
ora2k
oral2
or2f1a
1org
1orie
o1s2
osip1
o2s1y
o1t
otak1
o2t1an
o2ti.
oton2
o1um
o1un
o1v
over1
1ovu
o1w
owat2
owe2
owek1
owo2
o1x
o1y
oya2k1
o1z
p1ade
paes1
paga2
paha2
pa1ib
pa2is
pa2ka
pam2a
p2ane
pap2
pasi1
pa1ud
pau1h
pa1uk
pa1up
pau2r
pa1us
2p1b
2p1c
pca1
pcu1
2p1d
peh2
pel2a
pe2us
2p1f
2p1g
2p1h2
pi2hu
pir2a
2pism
pis2p
pi2ta
piu1t
2p1j
2p1k
2pl2
pla2i
pla2k
p2las
p2leg
p2lek
p1lo.
p2loi
p2lon
plo2p
2p1m
2p1n
p2o
po2ka
polu1
popa2
2p1p
p2pu
p2r2
pria1
pri2t
pro2g
2p1s2
p2sik
psu2a
2p1t
pte2n
ptio2
p1w
2p1y
pyo2
2p1z
1qa
q1d
1qi
2q1l
q1r
q1s
qu2
qur1
q1w
1ra
2r1abd
r1abj
2radu
r1a2er
r2ai
ra2id
2rair2
ra2jo
2r1akh
ra1k2l
r1akr
r1alp
r1alu
2ran
r1an.
r2anc
r2anu
rara2
r1arg
r1ars
r1art
r1as2r
ra1up
ra1us
rayu1
r1aza
2r1b
rba1h2
rb2l
2r1c
rcar2
rci2k
2r1d
rdah2
rdel2
rdi2k
rdo2m
1re
r2ej
re1k2l
rera2
rete2
2r1etn
2reu
2r1f
r2fis
2r1g2
2r1h2
1ri
ria2k
rial2
riam2
r1ijm
r1iju
riki2
2rikl
r1ilm
2rins
r2ir.
r1isl
2rism
r1isy
2r1j
rju2m1
2r1k2
rkil2
2r1l
rla1h2
2r1m2
2r1n
rnal2
rnu1t
1ro
roi2
ro1kl
2role
rolo1
r1oms
ror2a
r1ord
ro2ri
2r1p
r1q
2r1r2
2r1s2
rsu1t2
2r1t
rta2d
rta1h
rtel2
rtib1
rtis2
rtu1h2
1ru
rua2k1
r1ube
r1uca
rui2
ru2ka
2rula
r1uns
2rur
r2uri
r1v
2r1w
rx1
2r1y
1ry.
r1z
1sa
sabo1
sa2fr
2sagu
sa1il
2san
s2ane
s2ap
sa2pa
sas2a
sa1uh
sa1uk
sa1um
sa2un
sa1up
sa1us
2s1b
2s1c
sce1
2s1d
sde1
sdi2k
1se
se2ib
se2il
ser2a
2s1f
sfi1
2s1g2
2s1h
s2ha.
1shal
s2har
s2ho
1si
si2et
siha2
2sinf
2sinh
2s1ins
2sinv
sip1l
sipo1
s2is
s2it
sium2
2s1j
2s1k2
ska2s
s2kop
2s1l2
sla2g
2s1m2
sman2
2s1n
sno2b1
1so
so2ka
so1kl
son2a
s1ops
2s1osm
so2ta
2s1p2
1s2pes
spo2t
2s1r
sram2
srek1
2s1s
2s1t2
1s2tab
sto2p
s2tud
1su
su2be
su2b1i
sur2d
su2ti
2s1v
2s1w
s2wal
s2was
1sy
2sy.
s1yan
sye2n1
syi2k
2syk
2syr
2syt
1ta.
1t2aa
1tab
1tad
2taf.
1tah
1ta2i1
ta1ib
ta1il
1taj
1t2a2k
1tal
1tam
tamu2
1tana
1t2ane
1tang
ta2or
1tar
1tas
tas2t
1tat
1ta2u
taul2
taum2
1taw
t1awu
2t1b
2t1c
tca1
2t1d
tde1n
1te
te2ha
t2ek
tek1l
t2el
teok1
te2ra
te2ru
2teso
te2uk
2t1f
2t1g
2t2h2
t1ha
tha1i
the1
1ti
tik2l
til2i
t1inc
t2ing
t2is
2tism
tis2p
tit2
2t1j
tje1
2t1k
tkam2
tke2n
2t1l
tla2k1
2t1m2
2t1n2
tng2
tnya2
1t2o
to2ka
to1kl
tot2
2t1p
2t2r2
tret1
2t1s2
tsa1n
tso2
t2suk
2t1t
1tu
tu2at
t1uge
tu1kr
tu2ma
tu2ng
tuo2r
tu2pi
tu2ti
2t1v
tva1
2t1w
2t1y
2t1z
u1a
u2aa
uam2b
uang1
ua2ni
ua2p1
ua2r1u
u2ate
u2a1u
u1b
uba1i
ube2
ubek1
ub1en
ub1h
ub1l
u2b1o
ubu2b1
ubuk1
u1c
uca2
1ucap
uce2
ucek1
ucu2
u1d
2uda
uda2k
1udek
u2d1h
2udos
uduk1
udu2l
udu2r
u1e
u2ef
uen1
u1f
u2f1l
u2fr
u1g
ugal1
uge2m
u2gl
u2gr
ugu2r
uh1em
2uhi
uhi2d
1uhj
u1ho
uhu2d
u1i
u2ia
u2ie
ui2k
1uik1u
ui2r1
1ui2su
u1j
uju2
ujud1
2uka
u2kan
uk1aw
2uke
u1kha
1uki2r
uk1l
2uks2
uku2e
uku2l
uku2m
u1l
u2laj
ula2k
ula2n
ule2
ulek1
ul2i
u2liz
u2l1ov
ulu2
uluh1
ulul1
umu2d
1umum
umu2r
umu2t
un1an
u2n1ay
uncu2
une2k1
ung1
ungi1
u1ngo
u1ngu
u2ni.
